California, session 20252026, AB1147.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 35790) is added to Part 21 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Education Code, to read: CHAPTER 5. Reorganization by the State Department of Education35790. (a) Separate from the procedures for the reorganization of school districts specified in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 35700), the department may transfer territory from one school district to another school district if all of the following conditions are met:(1) At least 95 percent of a city is contained within the boundaries of a single school district. (2) There are no school facilities located within the territory being transferred.(3) The city council has voted by a majority vote to petition the department to have all of the territory within its city boundaries to be contained within a single school district.(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), the department is authorized to approve a territory transfer agreement between the impacted school districts and the city and may establish limited and temporary financial remuneration requirements that must be paid, by either the acquiring school district or the city petitioning the department, to the school district that is relinquishing territory. The remuneration may be paid through the temporary transfer of average daily attendance-generated apportionments attributable to transferred pupils from the acquiring school district to the school district that is relinquishing the territory or as otherwise determined by the department.(c) Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 35500) shall apply to reorganizations pursuant to this chapter to the extent that they do not conflict.(d) The department shall develop regulations for purposes of this chapter.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.